Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1906
Eligible postsecondary educational institution, defined.

(1) Eligible postsecondary educational institution means a public or private postsecondary educational institution:

(a) Located in Nebraska;

(b) Primarily engaged in the instruction of students;

(c) Satisfying the provisions of Nebraska law relating to the approval and licensure of schools, colleges, and universities and maintaining accreditation by an accrediting organization recognized by the United States Department of Education;

(d) Offering courses of instruction in regularly scheduled classes to regularly enrolled undergraduate students who reside in Nebraska and have received high school diplomas or their equivalent; and

(e) Which has adopted, and has available for inspection, award refund and repayment policies.

(2) For a postsecondary educational institution not eligible prior to September 2, 2023, for purposes of this section, located in Nebraska means such eligible postsecondary educational institution:

(a) Has established a physical location in this state where students may receive instruction; and

(b) Maintains an administrative office in this state for the purposes of enrolling students, providing information to students about the institution, and providing student support services.

Laws 2003, LB 574, § 6;

Laws 2023, LB705, § 118.